ru: Тип применения клея: Ламинирование бровей; Пучковые ресницы; Двойное веко; Наращивание ресниц; Отдельные ресницы; Ламинирование ресниц; Ленточные ресницы; Другой
hu: Ragasztó alkalmazási típusa: Szemöldök-laminálás; Tincselt szempillák; Kettős szemhéj; Szempilla-hosszabbítás; Egyedi szempillák; Szempillalifting; Soros műszempilla; Egyéb
tr: Yapıştırıcı uygulama tipi: Kaş laminasyonu; Demet kirpikler; Çift göz kapağı; Kirpik uzatmaları; Tek tek kirpikler; Kirpik kaldırma; Şerit kirpikler; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de aplicare a adezivului: Laminare sprâncene; Gene smocuri; Pleoape dublă; Extensii de gene; Gene individuale; Lifting gene; Gene pe bandă; Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de aplicação do adesivo: Laminação de sobrancelhas; Cílios em tufos; Pálpebra dupla; Extensões de cílios; Cílios individuais; Lifting de cílios; Cílios em fita; Outro
pl: Typ zastosowania kleju: Laminacja brwi; Rzęsy kępkowe; Podwójna powieka; Przedłużanie rzęs; Rzęsy pojedyncze; Lifting rzęs; Rzęsy pasmowe; Inne
th: ประเภทการใช้กาว: ลามิเนทคิ้ว; ขนตาช่อ; ตาสองชั้น; ต่อขนตา; ขนตาเส้น; ดัดขนตา; ขนตาแถบ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ aplikácie lepidla: Laminácia obočia; Zväzkové riasy; Dvojité viečko; Predĺženie rias; Jednotlivé riasy; Lifting rias; Pásové riasy; Iné
it: Tipo di applicazione dell'adesivo: Laminazione sopracciglia; Ciglia a ciuffi; Doppia palpebra; Extension ciglia; Ciglia singole; Lash lift; Ciglia a striscia; Altro
ja: 接着剤アプリケーションタイプ: 眉毛ラミネーション; クラスターラッシュ; 二重まぶた用; まつ毛エクステンション; 個別まつ毛; ラッシュリフト; ストリップラッシュ; その他
hr-HR: Tip primjene ljepila: Laminacija obrva; Klaster trepavice; Dvostruki kapak; Ekstenzije trepavica; Pojedinačne trepavice; Lifting trepavica; Trakaste trepavice; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип на приложение на лепилото: Ламиниране на вежди; Снопчести мигли; Двоен клепач; Удължаване на мигли; Индивидуални мигли; Повдигане на мигли; Ленти мигли; Други
zh-TW: 黏合劑應用類型: 眉毛定型; 簇狀睫毛; 雙眼皮; 睫毛嫁接; 單根睫毛; 睫毛翹曲; 整片睫毛; 其他
fr: Type d’application de l’adhésif: Lamination des sourcils; Cils en grappes; Double paupière; Extensions de cils; Cils individuels; Rehaussement de cils; Cils en bande; Autre
el: Τύπος εφαρμογής κόλλας: Πλαστικοποίηση φρυδιών; Τσαμπιά βλεφαρίδων; Διπλό βλέφαρο; Επεκτάσεις βλεφαρίδων; Μεμονωμένες βλεφαρίδες; Ανασήκωμα βλεφαρίδων; Ταινίες βλεφαρίδων; Άλλο
cs: Typ aplikace lepidla: Laminace obočí; Trsové řasy; Dvojité víčko; Prodlužování řas; Jednotlivé řasy; Lifting řas; Pásové řasy; Jiné
zh-CN: 粘合剂应用类型: 眉毛定型; 簇状睫毛; 双眼皮; 睫毛嫁接; 单根睫毛; 睫毛卷翘; 条状睫毛; 其他
nl: Lijmtoepassingstype: Wenkbrauwlaminatie; Clusterwimpers; Dubbel ooglid; Wimperextensions; Individuele wimpers; Lash lift; Stripwimpers; Andere
fi: Liiman käyttötyyppi: Kulmakarvojen laminointi; Nipputekoripset; Kaksoisluomi; Ripsipidennykset; Yksittäiset ripset; Ripsien kohotus; Nauharipset; Muu
vi: Loại ứng dụng keo dán: Laminate lông mày; Mi cụm; Mí đôi; Nối mi; Mi lẻ; Uốn mi; Mi dải; Khác
de: Anwendungstyp für Kleiber: Augenbrauen-Laminierung; Büschelwimpern; Doppeltes Augenlid; Wimpernverlängerungen; Einzelwimpern; Wimpernlifting; Wimpernbänder; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Klijų naudojimo tipas: Antakių laminavimas; Pluoštelinės blakstienos; Dvigubas akies vokas; Blakstienų priauginimas; Pavienės blakstienos; Blakstienų pakėlimas; Juostinės blakstienos; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de aplicação do adesivo: Laminação de sobrancelhas; Pestanas em tufos; Pálpebra dupla; Extensões de pestanas; Pestanas individuais; Lifting de pestanas; Pestanas em fita; Outro
nb: Limpåføringstype: Brynlaminering; Klyngevipper; Dobbelt øyelokk; Vippeextensions; Individuelle vipper; Vippeløft; Båndvipper; Annet
da: Klæbemiddelpåføringstype: Brynlaminering; Klyngevipper; Dobbelt øjenlåg; Vippeextensions; Individuelle vipper; Vippeløft; Strimmelvipper; Andet
es: Tipo de aplicación del adhesivo: Laminación de cejas; Pestañas en racimo; Párpado doble; Extensiones de pestañas; Pestañas individuales; Lifting de pestañas; Pestañas en tira; Otros
en: Adhesive application type: Brow lamination; Cluster lashes; Double eyelid; Eyelash extensions; Individual lashes; Lash lift; Strip lashes; Other
sl-SI: Tip nanosa lepila: Laminiranje obrvi; Šopki trepalnic; Dvojna veka; Podaljški trepalnic; Posamezne trepalnice; Lifting trepalnic; Trakaste trepalnice; Drugo
sv: Limmets användningstyp: Brynlaminering; Klusterfransar; Dubbelt ögonlock; Fransförlängningar; Individuella fransar; Franslyft; Remsfransar; Övrigt
ko: 접착제 적용 유형: 브로우 라미네이션; 클러스터 래쉬; 쌍꺼풀; 속눈썹 연장; 개별 속눈썹; 래쉬 리프트; 스트립 래쉬; 기타